Washington statutes.
RCW 13.38.170

Removal of Indian child from adoptive or foster care placement.

(1) If a final decree of adoption of an Indian child has been vacated or set aside or the adoptive parents voluntarily consent to the termination of their parental rights to the child, the biological parent or prior Indian custodian may petition to have the child returned to their custody and the court shall grant the request unless there is a showing by clear and convincing evidence that return of custody to the biological parent or prior Indian custodian is not in the best interests of the Indian child.

(2) If an Indian child is removed from a foster care placement or a preadoptive or adoptive home for the purpose of further foster care, preadoptive, or adoptive placement, the placement shall be in accordance with this chapter, except when an Indian child is being returned to the parent or Indian custodian from whose custody the child was originally removed.

[ 2011 c 309 s 17.]